Washington statutes.
RCW 41.76.015

Exclusive bargaining representatives—Duty of representation.

The employee organization which has been determined by the commission to be the exclusive bargaining representative of a bargaining unit shall be required to represent all the faculty members within the bargaining unit without regard to membership in that employee organization: PROVIDED, That any faculty member may at any time present his or her complaints or concerns to the employer and have such complaints or concerns adjusted without intervention of the exclusive bargaining representative, as long as the exclusive bargaining representative has been given an opportunity to be present at the adjustment and to make its views known, and as long as the adjustment is not inconsistent with the terms of a collective bargaining agreement then in effect.

[ 2002 c 356 s 6.]